Hawaii, session 2026, HB1315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that parliamentarians have a significant impact on condominium associations in Hawaii.  Condominium associations will often use parliamentarians to advise on meeting procedures and chair meetings, which in some cases, violates association governing documents that require the board president to preside over all meetings.  There have been reports that parliamentarians are given access to board packets before board meetings; participating in executive sessions; and asserting their legal opinions regarding the interpretation of association governing documents and condominium laws under chapter 514B, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The legislature further finds that it is widely known that parliamentarians are being used when there are conflicts within condominium associations, which is an ever-increasing problem in Hawaii and throughout the nation.  Parliamentarians are reportedly being weaponized by board presidents and association boards to silence or retaliate against association members who raise concerns, in violation of section 514B-191, Hawaii Revised Statutes.  The expenditure of association funds to hire parliamentarians who are then used to improperly silence or retaliate association members may be considered a misappropriation of association funds. The legislature also finds that parliamentarians are not required to be licensed within the State. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to require that all parliamentarians doing business in the State be licensed with the department of commerce and consumer affairs and complete mandatory training courses from an accredited third party, including training courses related to condominium associations and chapter 514B, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 2.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter parliamentarians §   -1  Definition.  For the purposes of this chapter, "department" means the department of commerce and consumer affairs. §   -2  License; mandatory training; required. (a)  Beginning January 1, 2026, no person shall engage in business as a parliamentarian or use the title of "parliamentarian" without: (1)  A valid license issued by the department; and (2)  Completing mandatory training courses from an accredited third party, including training courses related to condominium associations and chapter 514B. (b) Any person who violates this section shall be subject to a fine of no more than $           for each separate offense.  Each day of each violation shall constitute a separate offense. §   -3  Rules.  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this chapter, including the establishment of licensure requirements." SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________